apertium-haw.haw.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>aAáÁăảạÆbBcCčdDÐeEéèễệfFgGhHiIíjJkKlLmMnNoOóöớpPqQrRsSšştTŢuUúüưvVwWxXyYzZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="ʻTo beʻ verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="ʻTo haveʻ verb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"              c="Masculine/Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>

    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

    <sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="perf"            c="Pefect"/>
    <sdef n="past"            c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="fut"             c="Future"/>	  
    <sdef n="pp"              c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"             c="Pluperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pii"             c="Imperfect"/>	  
    <sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>

    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>

    <sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

	<!-- Determiners -->
    <pardef n="ke__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ka__det">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>na</l><r>ka<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kei/a__det">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a<b/>mau</l><r>a<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="keia__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="hale__n">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- Adjectives -->
	<pardef n="akamai__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	  

	<!-- Verbs -->
	<pardef n="lohe__vblex">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="__vblex_pp">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="__vblex_inf">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l> ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	

	<pardef n="__vblex_pres">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	  


	<!-- Prepositions -->
	<pardef n="me__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<!-- Conjunctions -->
	<pardef n="aka__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	  	  
  	</pardefs>

    <e lm="ka"><i></i><par n="/ka__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="ke__det"/></e>
    <e lm="keia"><i>kei</i><par n="kei/a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kena"><i>ken</i><par n="kei/a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kela"><i>kel</i><par n="kei/a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="keia"><i>keia</i><par n="keia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kela"><i>kela</i><par n="keia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ʻili laʻau"><i>ʻili<b/>laʻau</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ʻupa"><i>ʻupa</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awakea"><i>awakea</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoʻoholo"><i>hoʻoholo</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iʻa ʻulaʻula"><i>iʻa<b/>ʻulaʻula</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamaʻaina"><i>kamaʻaina</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komo"><i>komo</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lana"><i>lana</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mea"><i>mea</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penikala"><i>penikala</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="waiu"><i>waiu</i><par n="hale__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aʻole"><i>aʻole</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="akeakamai"><i>akeakamai</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aliʻi"><i>aliʻi</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hauʻoli"><i>hauʻoli</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ikaika"><i>ikaika</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaumaha"><i>kaumaha</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liʻiliʻi"><i>liʻiliʻi</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maikaʻi"><i>maikaʻi</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maluhiluhi"><i>maluhiluhi</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nani"><i>nani</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wela"><i>wela</i><par n="akamai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="haku"><i>haku</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haku"><p><l>e<b/>haku</l><r>haku</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="haku"><p><l>i<b/>haku</l><r>haku</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="haku"><p><l>ke<b/>haku<b/>nei</l><r>haku</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="hana"><i>hana</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hana"><p><l>e<b/>hana</l><r>hana</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="hana"><p><l>i<b/>hana</l><r>hana</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="hana"><p><l>ke<b/>hana<b/>nei</l><r>hana</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="hanau"><i>hanau</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hanau"><p><l>e<b/>hanau</l><r>hanau</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="hanau"><p><l>i<b/>hanau</l><r>hanau</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="hanau"><p><l>ke<b/>hanau<b/>nei</l><r>hanau</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="haole"><i>haole</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haole"><p><l>e<b/>haole</l><r>haole</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="haole"><p><l>i<b/>haole</l><r>haole</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="haole"><p><l>ke<b/>haole<b/>nei</l><r>haole</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="helu"><i>helu</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="helu"><p><l>e<b/>helu</l><r>helu</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="helu"><p><l>i<b/>helu</l><r>helu</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="helu"><p><l>ke<b/>helu<b/>nei</l><r>helu</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="hiamoe"><i>hiamoe</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hiamoe"><p><l>e<b/>hiamoe</l><r>hiamoe</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="hiamoe"><p><l>i<b/>hiamoe</l><r>hiamoe</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="hiamoe"><p><l>ke<b/>hiamoe<b/>nei</l><r>hiamoe</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="hiu"><i>hiu</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hiu"><p><l>e<b/>hiu</l><r>hiu</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="hiu"><p><l>i<b/>hiu</l><r>hiu</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="hiu"><p><l>ke<b/>hiu<b/>nei</l><r>hiu</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="honua"><i>honua</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="honua"><p><l>e<b/>honua</l><r>honua</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="honua"><p><l>i<b/>honua</l><r>honua</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="honua"><p><l>ke<b/>honua<b/>nei</l><r>honua</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="kakau"><i>kakau</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kakau"><p><l>e<b/>kakau</l><r>kakau</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="kakau"><p><l>i<b/>kakau</l><r>kakau</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="kakau"><p><l>ke<b/>kakau<b/>nei</l><r>kakau</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="kino"><i>kino</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kino"><p><l>e<b/>kino</l><r>kino</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="kino"><p><l>i<b/>kino</l><r>kino</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="kino"><p><l>ke<b/>kino<b/>nei</l><r>kino</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="kono"><i>kono</i><par n="lohe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kono"><p><l>e<b/>kono</l><r>kono</r></p><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="kono"><p><l>i<b/>kono</l><r>kono</r></p><par n="__vblex_pp"/></e>
    <e lm="kono"><p><l>ke<b/>kono<b/>nei</l><r>kono</r></p><par n="__vblex_pres"/></e>
    <e lm="aʻe"><i>aʻe</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aʻo"><i>aʻo</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ko"><i>ko</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mai"><i>mai</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="me__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="aka__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="aka"><i>aka</i><par n="aka__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a me"><i>a<b/>me</i><par n="aka__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="malama"><i>malama</i><par n="aka__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="aka__cnjcoo"/></e>
